Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-811.01
Lottery Investigation Petty Cash
Fund; establishment; use; investment; Tax Commissioner; department; duties;
records and reports.

(1) The
Tax Commissioner may apply to the Director of Administrative Services and
the Auditor of Public Accounts to establish and maintain a Lottery Investigation
Petty Cash Fund. The money used to initiate and maintain the fund shall be
drawn solely from the State Lottery Operation Cash Fund. The Tax Commissioner
shall determine the amount of money to be held in the Lottery Investigation
Petty Cash Fund, consistent with carrying out the duties and responsibilities
of the division but not to exceed five thousand dollars for the entire division.
This restriction shall not apply to funds otherwise appropriated to the State
Lottery Operation Cash Fund for investigative purposes. When the Director
of Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts have approved
the establishment of the Lottery Investigation Petty Cash Fund, a voucher
shall be submitted to the Department of Administrative Services accompanied
by such information as the department may require for the establishment of
the fund. The Director of Administrative Services shall issue a warrant for
the amount specified and deliver it to the division. The fund may be replenished
as necessary, but the total amount in the fund shall not exceed ten thousand
dollars in any fiscal year. The fund shall be audited by the Auditor of Public
Accounts.

(2) Any prize
amounts won, less any investigative expenditures, by department personnel
with funds drawn from the Lottery Investigation Petty Cash Fund or reimbursed
from the State Lottery Operation Cash Fund shall be deposited into the Lottery
Investigation Petty Cash Fund.

(3) For the
purpose of establishing and maintaining legislative oversight and accountability,
the Department of Revenue shall maintain records of all expenditures, disbursements,
and transfers of cash from the Lottery Investigation Petty Cash Fund.

(4) By September
15 of each year, the department shall report to the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services and to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst
the unexpended balance existing on June 30 of the previous fiscal year relating
to investigative expenses in the Lottery Investigation Petty Cash Fund and
any funds existing on June 30 of the previous fiscal year in the possession
of division personnel involved in investigations. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall
be submitted electronically. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 117;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 28;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 14.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.